New York, session 2025-2026, A6043.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 6 and 7 of section 259 of the executive law, 2 as added by chapter 427 of the laws of 2021, are amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. "Technical violation" means any conduct that violates a condition 5 of community supervision in an important respect, other than the commis- 6 sion of a new felony or misdemeanor offense under the penal law or 7 conduct that violates a specific condition of community supervision in 8 an important respect and such conduct may result in serious harm to the 9 releasee or others. 10 7. "Non-technical violation" means: (a) the commission of a new felony 11 or misdemeanor offense; or (b) conduct that violates a specific condi- 12 tion of community supervision and such conduct may result in serious 13 harm to the releasee or others; or (c) conduct by a releasee who is 14 serving a sentence for an offense defined in article [130] one hundred 15 thirty of the penal law (sex offenses), article one hundred thirty-five 16 of the penal law (kidnapping, coercion and related offenses), article 17 two hundred sixty-five of the penal law (firearms and other dangerous 18 weapons) or section 255.26 or 255.27 of such law, and such conduct 19 violated a specific condition reasonably related to such offense and 20 efforts to protect the public from the commission of a repeat of such 21 offense including any violation of article six-C of the correction law. 22 § 2. Subparagraph (xii) of paragraph (f) of subdivision 3 of section 23 259-i of the executive law, as amended by chapter 427 of the laws of 24 2021, is amended to read as follows: 25 (xii) For each violation found, the presiding officer may (A) direct 26 that the releasee be restored to supervision; (B) as an alternative to 27 reincarceration, direct the releasee receive re-entry services in the 28 community from qualified nonprofit agencies; or (C) direct the viola- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03040-01-5 A. 6043 2 1 tor's reincarceration and for non-technical violations fix a date for 2 consideration by the board for re-release on presumptive release, or 3 parole or conditional release, as the case may be; or (D) for non-tech- 4 nical violations in the case of persons released to a period of post-re- 5 lease supervision, direct the violator's reincarceration up to the 6 balance of the remaining period of post-release supervision, not to 7 exceed five years; provided, however, that a defendant serving a term of 8 post-release supervision for a conviction of a felony sex offense 9 defined in section 70.80 of the penal law may be subject to a further 10 period of imprisonment up to the balance of the remaining period of 11 post-release supervision, shall apply for technical violations; and the 12 following limitations: 13 (1) Absconding. For absconding up to [seven] thirty days reincarcera- 14 tion may be imposed for the first violation, up to [fifteen] sixty days 15 reincarceration may be imposed for the second violation, and up to 16 [thirty] ninety days reincarceration may be imposed for the third or any 17 subsequent violation, provided, however, that no releasee shall be rein- 18 carcerated for more than seven days for absconding if such releasee 19 voluntarily presents themself to such releasee's community supervision 20 officer or area bureau office; 21 (2) Sanctions for certain technical violations. Reincarceration shall 22 not be imposed for a sustained technical violation that involves: (a) 23 violating curfew; (b) alcohol use, provided however that incarceration 24 is permissible for alcohol use if the person is subject to community 25 supervision due to a conviction for driving under the influence of alco- 26 hol; (c) drug use, provided, however incarceration is permissible for 27 drug use if the person is subject to community supervision due to a 28 conviction for driving under the influence of drugs; (d) failing to 29 notify parole officer of a change in employment or program status; (e) 30 failing to pay surcharges and fees; (f) obtaining a driver's license or 31 driving a car with a valid driver's license, provided however incarcera- 32 tion is permissible if either action is explicitly prohibited by the 33 person's conviction; (g) failing to notify community supervision officer 34 of contact with any law enforcement agency, provided however, incarcera- 35 tion is permissible if the person intended to hide illegal behavior or 36 in instances where the conduct violates a specific condition of communi- 37 ty supervision in an important respect and such conduct may result in 38 serious harm to the releasee or others; (h) failing to obey other 39 special conditions, provided however that incarceration is permissible 40 if the failure cannot be addressed in the community and all reasonable 41 community-based means to address the failure have been exhausted; and 42 (3) Sanctions for all other technical violations. For all other tech- 43 nical violations, no period of reincarceration may be imposed for the 44 first and second substantiated technical violations for which incarcera- 45 tion may be imposed; up to seven days reincarceration may be imposed for 46 the third substantiated technical violation for which incarceration may 47 be imposed; up to fifteen days reincarceration may be imposed for the 48 fourth substantiated technical violation for which incarceration may be 49 imposed; up to thirty days reincarceration may be imposed for the fifth 50 and subsequent substantiated technical violations for which incarcera- 51 tion may be imposed. Provided, however, that a period of reincarcera- 52 tion may be imposed for conduct that violates a specific condition of 53 community supervision in an important respect and that such conduct may 54 result in serious harm to the releasee or others. 55 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.